Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-303
Registration of electors; other places of registration.

In addition to his or her office, the election commissioner or county clerk may provide a place of registration in each incorporated city or village in the county and in each legislative district in cities of the metropolitan class. The place of registration may be open not less than one day within the thirty days prior to the statewide primary election and the statewide general election and at such times and during such hours as the election commissioner or county clerk may direct. An election commissioner or county clerk may establish a permanent place of registration in each incorporated city or village in the county or each legislative district in a city of the metropolitan class by training registered voters to act as deputy registrars. A private residence shall not be used as a permanent place of registration except in incorporated villages.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 65;

Laws 2002, LB 935, § 4.